District of Columbia statutes.
47-851

Repealed

Residential property tax relief — report on assessment changes for highest assessed properties.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1978, D.C. Law 2-45, § 6, 24 DCR 3614
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-130, § 7(c), 25 DCR 2517
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-127, § 3(b), 41 DCR 2050
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-147, § 2(f), 49 DCR 4219

Definitions applicable: The definitions in § 47-803 apply to this section.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 14-147 provided that section 2 shall apply as of October 1, 2001, except insofar as the retroactive application results in an increase of tax to the real property or owner thereof.

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(f) of Homestead and Senior Citizen Real Property Tax Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-226, January 8, 2002, 49 DCR 668).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see §§ 2(f), 3 of Homestead and Senior Citizen Real Property Tax Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-190, November 29, 2001, 48 DCR 11219).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(f) of Homestead and Senior Citizen Real Property Tax Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-92, March 19, 2002, 49 DCR 2997).
1973 Ed., § 47-659.2.
1981 Ed., § 47-851.